Georgia statutes. TITLE 45 Public Officers and Employees
Subpart 1 Federal Assistance

45-12-110.
Notification of intention to apply for federal assistance; adoption and promulgation of rules and regulations and forms.

Any state department, board, bureau, commission, authority, or other state agency, except the Board of Regents of the University System of Georgia and its employees, intending to apply for any new program of federal assistance under any federal program shall notify the House Budget and Research Office, the Senate Budget and Evaluation Office, and the director of the Office of Planning and Budget of its intention to apply for such federal assistance at least 30 days prior to filing the application for such assistance. Such notification shall include a summary description of the proposed federal assistance project, the amount of federal funds to be requested, the amount of state matching funds, if any, to be required in connection with obtaining federal assistance, and the period of time to be covered by the proposed federal assistance project.

The House Budget and Research Office, the Senate Budget and Evaluation Office, and the director of the Office of Planning and Budget, acting jointly or independently, are authorized and directed to devise and distribute such forms as may be necessary to carry out subsection (a) of this Code section and, in connection therewith, to adopt and promulgate such rules and regulations as may be necessary to ensure compliance with said subsection.

History.

Ga. L. 1972, p. 411, § 1; Ga. L. 1990, p. 8, § 45; Ga. L. 2008, p. VO1, § 1-19/HB 529; Ga. L. 2014, p. 866, § 45/SB 340.

The 2014 amendment,

effective April 29, 2014, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted “House Budget and Research Office, the Senate Budget and Evaluation Office” for “House Budget Office, the Senate Budget Office” in subsections (a) and (b).

45-12-111.
Legislative budget analyst to analyze impact of proposed federal assistance project; forwarding of copy of analysis to General Assembly members.

As soon as practicable after receiving a notification provided for in Code Section 45-12-110, it shall be the duty of the legislative budget analyst to analyze the short-term and long-term impact the proposed federal assistance project would have on state budgetary and fiscal matters if the application for federal assistance were approved. Upon completion of said analysis, the legislative budget analyst shall forward a copy of same to the President of the Senate, the Speaker of the House of Representatives, each member of the appropriations committees of the House of Representatives and Senate, and to any member of the General Assembly requesting a copy of said analysis.

History.

Ga. L. 1972, p. 411, § 2.

45-12-112.
Duties of director of Office of Planning and Budget.

The director of the Office of Planning and Budget shall perform such duties in connection with receiving the notifications provided for in Code Section 45-12-110 as may be required by the Governor.

History.

Ga. L. 1972, p. 411, § 3.